Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 6. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 91-17-601.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

§ 91-17-602.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

§ 91-17-603.
Application of chapter to existing trusts and estates.

This chapter applies to every trust or decedent’s estate existing on January 1, 2013, except as otherwise expressly provided in the will or terms of the trust or in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

§ 91-17-604.
Transitional matter.

Section 91-17-409 applies to a trust described in Section 91-17-409(d) on and after the following dates:

If the trust is not funded as of January 1, 2013, the date of the decedent’s death.

If the trust is initially funded in the calendar year beginning January 1, 2013, the date of the decedent’s death.

If the trust is not described in paragraph (1) or (2), January 1, 2013.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.